Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.460

Abandonment—Effect.

If a majority of the votes cast upon the proposition of abandoning the commission form of city government favor the proposition, the city shall be reorganized under general laws immediately upon the first election of city officers, which shall be held on the date of the next general city election of cities of its class. The change in form of government shall not affect the property, rights, or liabilities of the city.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.460. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 23, part; RRS s 9112, part.]